Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.100

Federal law reference.

(1) All references to a federal statute in this chapter mean the statute and its implementing regulations existing on June 7, 2018, or the date of such subsequent version as the department may adopt by rule.

(2) Where the referenced federal statute refers to the "secretary," the meaning for the purpose of this chapter is "secretary" or "director."

(3) A reference to a federal statute excludes any matters in the federal statute that are inapplicable to state jurisdiction.

[ 2018 c 236 s 101.]